Florida, session 2026, HB6025.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraphs (g) and (h) of subsection (11) of
section 1002.395, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
1002.395 Florida Tax Credit Scholarship Program.—
(11) SCHOLARSHIP AMOUNT AND PAYMENT.—
(g) Reimbursements for program expenditures may continue
until the account balance is expended or remaining funds have
reverted to the state.
(h) A student's scholarship account must be closed and any
remaining funds shall revert to the state after:
1. Denial or revocation of program eligibility by the
commissioner for fraud or abuse, including, but not limited to,
the student or student's parent accepting any payment, refund,
or rebate, in any manner, from a provider of any services
received pursuant to paragraph (6)(d);
2. Two consecutive fiscal years in which an account has
been inactive; or
3. The student remains unenrolled in an eligible private
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6025-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6025 2026
school for 30 days while receiving a scholarship that requires
full-time enrollment.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6025-00